Maine, session 132, LD53.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1051, first ¶, as repealed and replaced by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A,
§2, is amended to read:
Court may not be held on Sunday or any day designated for the annual Thanksgiving;
New Year's Day, January 1st; Martin Luther King, Jr., Day, the 3rd Monday in January;
Washington's Birthday, the 3rd Monday in February; Patriot's Day, the 3rd Monday in
April; Memorial Day, the last Monday in May, but if the Federal Government designates
May 30th as the date for observance of Memorial Day, the 30th of May; Juneteenth, June
19th; the 4th of July; Labor Day, the first Monday of September; Indigenous Peoples Day,
the 2nd Monday in October; the day of the general election, as defined in Title 21-A, section
1, subsection 19; Veterans Day, November 11th; or on Christmas Day. The Chief Justice
of the Supreme Judicial Court may order that court be held on a legal holiday when the
Chief Justice finds that the interests of justice and judicial economy in any particular case
will be served. The public offices in county buildings may be closed to business on the
holidays named in this section. When any one of the holidays named in this section falls
on Sunday, the Monday following must be observed as a holiday, with all the privileges
applying to any of the days named in this section.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §60 is enacted to read:
§60. General election day established as state holiday
The day of the general election, as defined in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 19, is a
state holiday. All nonessential state offices must be closed on the day of the general
election.
Sec. 3. 9-B MRSA §145, sub-§1, ¶I-1 is enacted to read:
I-1. The day of the general election, as defined in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 19;
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §4802, sub-§1, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. The day of the general election, as defined in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection
19;